Hawaii statutes.
[§328-106] Pharmacy benefit
manager; maximum allowable cost. (a) A pharmacy benefit manager that
reimburses a contracting pharmacy for a drug on a maximum allowable cost basis
shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(b) The pharmacy benefit manager shall include
the following in the contract information with a contracting pharmacy:

(1) Information identifying any national drug pricing
compendia; or

(2) Other data sources for the maximum allowable cost
list.

(c) The pharmacy benefit manager shall make
available to a contracting pharmacy, upon request, the most up-to-date maximum
allowable cost price or prices used by the pharmacy benefit manager for
patients served by the pharmacy in a readily accessible, secure, and usable
web-based or other comparable format.

(d) A drug shall not be included on a maximum
allowable cost list or reimbursed on a maximum allowable cost basis unless all
of the following apply:

(1) The drug is listed as "A" or
"B" rated in the most recent version of the Orange Book or has a
rating of "NR", "NA", or similar rating by a nationally
recognized reference;

(2) The drug is generally available for purchase in
this State from a national or regional wholesaler; and

(3) The drug is not obsolete.

(e) The pharmacy benefit manager shall review
and make necessary adjustments to the maximum allowable cost of each drug on a
maximum allowable cost list at least once every seven days using the most
recent data sources available, and shall apply the updated maximum allowable
cost list beginning that same day to reimburse the contracted pharmacy until
the pharmacy benefit manager next updates the maximum allowable cost list in
accordance with this section.

(f) The pharmacy benefit manager shall have a
clearly defined process for a contracting pharmacy to appeal the maximum
allowable cost for a drug on a maximum allowable cost list that complies with
all of the following:

(1) A contracting pharmacy may base its appeal on one
or more of the following:

(A) The maximum allowable cost for a drug is
below the cost at which the drug is available for purchase by similarly
situated pharmacies in this State from a national or regional wholesaler; or

(B) The drug does not meet the requirements
of subsection (d);

(2) A contracting pharmacy shall be provided no less
than fourteen business days following receipt of payment for a claim to file
the appeal with the pharmacy benefit manager;

(3) The pharmacy benefit manager shall make a final
determination on the contracting pharmacy's appeal no later than fourteen
business days after the pharmacy benefit manager's receipt of the appeal;

(4) If the maximum allowable cost is upheld on
appeal, the pharmacy benefit manager shall provide to the contracting pharmacy
the reason therefor and the national drug code of an equivalent drug that may
be purchased by a similarly situated pharmacy at a price that is equal to or
less than the maximum allowable cost of the drug that is the subject of the
appeal; and

(5) If the maximum allowable cost is not upheld on
appeal, the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust, for the appealing
contracting pharmacy, the maximum allowable cost of the drug that is the
subject of the appeal, within one calendar day of the date of the decision on
the appeal and allow the contracting pharmacy to reverse and rebill the
appealed claim.

(g) A contracting pharmacy shall not disclose
to any third party the maximum allowable cost list and any related information
it receives, either directly from a pharmacy benefit manager or through a
pharmacy services administrative organization or similar entity with which the
pharmacy has a contract to provide administrative services for that pharmacy.
[L 2015, c 175, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next